Maryland, session 2026, SB0457.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
6–202.1.
The Mayor and City Council of Baltimore City or the governing body of a county may
establish, by law, a subclass of real property consisting of:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0457*

SENATE BILL 457
(1) vacant lots or improved property cited as vacant and unfit for
habitation or other authorized use on a housing or building violation notice;
(2) LAND; OR
(3) IMPROVEMENTS TO LAND.
6–302.
(b) (1) Except as provided in [subsection] SUBSECTIONS (c) AND (E) of this
section and §§ 6–305 and 6–306 of this subtitle:
(i) there shall be a single county property tax rate for all real
property subject to county property tax except for operating real property described in §
8–109(c) of this article; and
(ii) the county tax rate applicable to personal property and the
operating real property described in § 8–109(c) of this article shall be no more than 2.5
times the rate for real property.
(2) Paragraph (1) of this subsection does not affect a special rate prevailing
in a taxing district or part of a county.
(E) (1) THE MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY OR THE
GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY MAY SET SEPARATE REAL PROPERTY TAX RATES
FOR EACH OF THE FOLLOWING SUBCLASSES OF REAL PROPERTY:
(I) LAND; AND
(II) IMPROVEMENTS TO LAND.
(2) IF THE MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY OR THE
GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY ESTABLISHES SEPARATE REAL PROPERTY TAX
RATES UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION:
(I) THE TAX RATE FOR LAND AND THE TAX RATE FOR
IMPROVEMENTS TO LAND ARE NOT REQUIRED TO BE EQUAL; AND
(II) EACH OF THE SEPARATE TAX RATES SHALL APPLY
UNIFORMLY THROUGHOUT THE TAXING JURISDICTION TO ALL REAL PROPERTY
WITHIN THE SUBCLASS TO WHICH THE TAX RATE APPLIES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2027.